Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.89, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Violation; when petty misdemeanor enhanced to misdemeanor. new text begin (a) new text end Unless otherwise declared in this chapter with respect to particular offenses, it is a petty misdemeanor for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required by this chapter; except that: (1) a violation which is committed in a manner or under circumstances so as to endanger or be likely to endanger any person or property; or (2) exclusive of violations relating to the standing or parking of an unattended vehicle, a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, classified therein as a petty misdemeanor, when preceded by two or more petty misdemeanor convictions within the immediate preceding 12-month period; is a misdemeanor to which the provisions of subdivision 2 shall not apply. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the Judicial Council may not place a violation described in paragraph (a), clause (1), on the uniform fine schedule. A violation under paragraph (a), clause (1), requires a court appearance. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding section 609.0331 or 609.101, or other law to the contrary, a person who violates paragraph (a), clause (2), is assessed an additional surcharge equal to the amount of the fine imposed for the violation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations occurring on or after that date. new text end